lexc/noun/enhufnevek.lexc
LEXICON Plurottvar
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genottvar;
                            Genottvar;
        
LEXICON Famottvar
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genottvar;
                       Genottvar;

LEXICON Genottvar
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseottvar;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseottvar;
                       Caseottvar;
 
LEXICON Caseottvar
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t           #;  ! at, et
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sue:^+cSue^§oeoe§tt         #;  ! ott, ett, ött
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounlord1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurlord1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famlord1;

LEXICON Plurlord1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genlord1;
                            Genlord1;
        
LEXICON Famlord1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genlord1;
                       Genlord1;

LEXICON Genlord1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caselord1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caselord1;
                       Caselord1;
 
LEXICON Caselord1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounlord3
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posslord3;

LEXICON Posslord3
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famlord3;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famlord3;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famlord3;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famlord3;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famlord3;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famlord3;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famlord3;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famlord3;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famlord3;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famlord3;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famlord3;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famlord3;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famlord3;

LEXICON Famlord3
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genlord3;
                       Genlord3;

LEXICON Genlord3
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caselord3;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caselord3;
                       Caselord3;
 
LEXICON Caselord3
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNountudt
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posstudt;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurtudt;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Posstudt
!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Gentudt;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Gentudt;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Gentudt;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Gentudt;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Gentudt;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Gentudt;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Gentudt;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Gentudt;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Gentudt;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Gentudt;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Gentudt;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Gentudt;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                           Gentudt;

LEXICON Plurtudt
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gentudt;
!                            Gentudt;
        
!LEXICON Fam
!Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
!|                       Gen;

LEXICON Gentudt
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casetudt;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casetudt;
                       Casetudt;
 
LEXICON Casetudt
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! uses Fam, Gen, Case of AddNoun
LEXICON AddNounanya
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possanya;

LEXICON Possanya
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^j§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^j§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
!                           Fam;

! uses Poss, fam of AddNoun
LEXICON AddNounkulonb
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posskulonb;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurkulonb;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;


LEXICON Plurkulonb
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^ek    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON Noun
apa:ap AddNounanya;
asszonyanya:asszonyany AddNounanya;
babaanya:babaany AddNounanya;
bagolyanya:bagolyany AddNounanya;
behúzóanya:behúzóany AddNounanya;
bokoranya:bokorany AddNounanya;
bálanya:bálany AddNounanya;
bányászanya:bányászany AddNounanya;
békaanya:békaany AddNounanya;
béranya:bérany AddNounanya;
bérapa:bérap AddNounanya;
családanya:családany AddNounanya;
családapa:családap AddNounanya;
csapágyanya:csapágyany AddNounanya;
csatlakozóanya:csatlakozóany AddNounanya;
csavaranya:csavarany AddNounanya;
csavarapa:csavarap AddNounanya;
cselédanya:cselédany AddNounanya;
csillaganya:csillagany AddNounanya;
csimpánzanya:csimpánzany AddNounanya;
csonkanya:csonkany AddNounanya;
dajkaanya:dajkaany AddNounanya;
doktorapa:doktorap AddNounanya;
dollárpapa:dollárpap AddNounanya;
drogkeresztapa:drogkeresztap AddNounanya;
drótanya:drótany AddNounanya;
dédanya:dédany AddNounanya;
dédapa:dédap AddNounanya;
dédnagyanya:dédnagyany AddNounanya;
dédnagyapa:dédnagyap AddNounanya;
ebanya:ebany AddNounanya;
egyházanya:egyházany AddNounanya;
egéranya:egérany AddNounanya;
elefántanya:elefántany AddNounanya;
ellenanya:ellenany AddNounanya;
előtolóanya:előtolóany AddNounanya;
emberanya:emberany AddNounanya;
emberapa:emberap AddNounanya;
faanya:faany AddNounanya;
fantomanya:fantomany AddNounanya;
farkasanya:farkasany AddNounanya;
fekvőanya:fekvőany AddNounanya;
festőtanya:festőtany AddNounanya;
fesztiválapa:fesztiválap AddNounanya;
feszítőcsavaranya:feszítőcsavarany AddNounanya;
fogadóanya:fogadóany AddNounanya;
frizsideranya:frizsiderany AddNounanya;
földanya:földany AddNounanya;
fürjanya:fürjany AddNounanya;
főnökanya:főnökany AddNounanya;
gepárdanya:gepárdany AddNounanya;
gondozóanya:gondozóany AddNounanya;
gyermekanya:gyermekany AddNounanya;
gólyaapa:gólyaap AddNounanya;
halálapa:halálap AddNounanya;
haranganya:harangany AddNounanya;
helynökanya:helynökany AddNounanya;
honanya:honany AddNounanya;
házanya:házany AddNounanya;
időanya:időany AddNounanya;
istenanya:istenany AddNounanya;
juhanya:juhany AddNounanya;
kellékanya:kellékany AddNounanya;
keresztapa:keresztap AddNounanya;
királyanya:királyany AddNounanya;
kisapa:kisap AddNounanya;
klónanya:klónany AddNounanya;
kontúranya:kontúrany AddNounanya;
koronaanya:koronaany AddNounanya;
krokodilanya:krokodilany AddNounanya;
kutyaanya:kutyaany AddNounanya;
kölcsönanya:kölcsönany AddNounanya;
köranya:körany AddNounanya;
különb AddNounkulonb;
kőanya:kőany AddNounanya;
legkülönb AddNounkulonb;
lelkészédesapa:lelkészédesap AddNounanya;
lányanya:lányany AddNounanya;
madáranya:madárany AddNounanya;
majomanya:majomany AddNounanya;
mintaapa:mintaap AddNounanya;
méhanya:méhany AddNounanya;
múzsaanya:múzsaany AddNounanya;
műapa:műap AddNounanya;
nagyapa:nagyap AddNounanya;
neccapa:neccap AddNounanya;
nyélanya:nyélany AddNounanya;
oroszlánanya:oroszlánany AddNounanya;
parasztanya:parasztany AddNounanya;
pontyanya:pontyany AddNounanya;
pólusanya:pólusany AddNounanya;
pótapa:pótap AddNounanya;
rendőranya:rendőrany AddNounanya;
rögzítőanya:rögzítőany AddNounanya;
seggapa:seggap AddNounanya;
skorpióanya:skorpióany AddNounanya;
szabályzóanya:szabályzóany AddNounanya;
szelepanya:szelepany AddNounanya;
szivacsanya:szivacsany AddNounanya;
szorítóanya:szorítóany AddNounanya;
szárnyasanya:szárnyasany AddNounanya;
szépapa:szépap AddNounanya;
szűzapa:szűzap AddNounanya;
sárkányapa:sárkányap AddNounanya;
tartalékanya:tartalékany AddNounanya;
tengelyanya:tengelyany AddNounanya;
termeszanya:termeszany AddNounanya;
teveanya:teveany AddNounanya;
tinianya:tiniany AddNounanya;
tudat:tudt AddNountudt;
táboranya:táborany AddNounanya;
törzsapa:törzsap AddNounanya;
vendéganya:vendégany AddNounanya;
világanya:világany AddNounanya;
vándoranya:vándorany AddNounanya;
védanya:védany AddNounanya;
zsellérapa:zsellérap AddNounanya;
zászlóapa:zászlóap AddNounanya;
államapa:államap AddNounanya;
édesanya:édesany AddNounanya;
éganya:égany AddNounanya;
óriásanya:óriásany AddNounanya;
öregapa:öregap AddNounanya;
ükapa:ükap AddNounanya;
üknagyapa:üknagyap AddNounanya;
őeminenciája AddNounlord1;
őeminenciája:őeminencia AddNounlord3;
őfelsége AddNounlord1;
őfelsége:őfelség AddNounlord3;
őfőméltósága AddNounlord1;
őfőméltósága:őfőméltóság AddNounlord3;
őkegyelme AddNounlord1;
őkegyelme:őkegyelm AddNounlord3;
őkegyelmessége AddNounlord1;
őkegyelmessége:őkegyelmesség AddNounlord3;
őkelme AddNounlord1;
őkelme:őkelm AddNounlord3;
őlordsága AddNounlord1;
őlordsága:őlordság AddNounlord3;
ősősapa:ősősap AddNounanya;
